Utah statutes.
62A-11-328.   Information received from State Tax Commission provided to
other states' child support collection agencies.
The office shall, upon request, provide to any other state's child support
collection agency the information which it receives from the State Tax
Commission under Subsection 59-1-403(3)(l), with regard to a support debt
which that agency is involved in enforcing.
